New York, session 2025-2026, A630.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 353-g to read as follows: 3 § 353-g. Tethering, restraining, caging or penning of dogs. 1. It 4 shall be unlawful to tie, tether, restrain, cage or pen a working or 5 non-working dog outdoors, between the hours of 7 p.m. to 6 a.m. 6 2. A working or non-working dog may be tied, tethered, caged or penned 7 outdoors between the hours of 6 a.m. and 7 p.m., to a stationary object 8 or a pen or cage in a sized pen or cage four times the height and length 9 of said dog; provided it is in a manner that is not inhumane or detri- 10 mental to the dog's welfare, doesn't cause the dog to choke, permits the 11 dog to escape harm and permits the dog to reach food, water, shade and 12 dry ground. 13 3. Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this section 14 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by incarceration in city, 15 town, village or county jail for not less than two days and not more 16 than six months, shall perform between forty-eight and one hundred twen- 17 ty hours of community service, and shall be subject to a fine of between 18 two hundred dollars and one thousand dollars, upon their first offense. 19 Upon their second offense, such person shall be subject to incarceration 20 in city, town, village or county jail for not less than ten days and not 21 more than six months, and shall be subject to a fine of between one 22 thousand dollars and two thousand dollars. Upon their third offense, 23 such person shall be subject to a felony. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 25 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02412-01-5